Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.078

Elections—Question of incorporation—Nomination and election of officers.

An election shall be held in the area proposed to be incorporated to determine whether the proposed city or town shall be incorporated when the boundary review board takes action on the proposal other than disapproving the proposal, or if the county legislative authority does not disapprove the proposal as provided in RCW 35.02.070. Voters at this election shall determine if the area is to be incorporated.

The initial election on the question of incorporation shall be held at the next special election date specified in RCW 29A.04.330 that occurs sixty or more days after the final public hearing by the county legislative authority or authorities, or action by the boundary review board or boards. The county legislative authority or authorities shall call for this election and, if the incorporation is approved, shall call for other elections to elect the elected officials as provided in this section. If the vote in favor of the incorporation receives forty percent or less of the total vote on the question of incorporation, no new election on the question of incorporation for the area or any portion of the area proposed to be incorporated may be held for a period of three years from the date of the election in which the incorporation failed.

If the incorporation is authorized as provided by RCW 35.02.120, separate elections shall be held to nominate and elect persons to fill the various elective offices prescribed by law for the population and type of city or town, and to which it will belong. The primary election to nominate candidates for these elective positions shall be held at the next special election date, as specified in RCW 29A.04.330, that occurs sixty or more days after the election on the question of incorporation. The election to fill these elective positions shall be held at the next special election date, as specified in RCW 29A.04.330, that occurs thirty or more days after certification of the results of the primary election.

[ 2015 c 53 s 17; 1994 c 216 s 18; 1986 c 234 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.